inc/V-CLASS_IS_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kíl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_IS_STEM_1

     is+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kíl is kíl
     is+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is kíl
     is+V+RELATIVE: kíl iss kíl
     is+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl isäsaa kíl
     is+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl isäs kíl
     is+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl isäsaang kíl
     is+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl isäsga kíl
     is+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl isäsaas kíl
     is+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl isäsaa.ang kíl
     is+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'uuj kíl
     is+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'uujang kíl
     is+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl isäsaa'uujang kíl
     is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'us kíl
     is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'ujaa kíl
     is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'uujaangaa kíl
     is+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl isäsaa'us kíl
     is+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl isäsaa'ahlans kíl
     is+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl isäseehl kíl
     is+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kíl is'uu kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'waa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'waa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'waang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kíl is'wägan kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'aawaa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kíl is'aawaan kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kíl is'waas kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kíl is'aawaas kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'waa.ang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'aawaa.ang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wägiinii kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wägaangaa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'wägaangaan kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl is'waaäsaa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl is'waaäs kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl is'waaäsaang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl is'waaäsga kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'waaäsaas kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'waaäsaa.ang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasa'áa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasa'áang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasaasdláa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasaasdláang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'waa'uuj kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'waa'uujang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl is'waaäsaa'uujang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'waa'us kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'waa'ujaa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'waa'uujaangaa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'waaäsaa'us kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kíl is'waa'ahlanggang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kíl is'waa'ahlanggan kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'waa'ahlanggiinii kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl is'waaäsaa'ahlans kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kíl is'waa'ahlans kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kíl is'aawaa'ahlang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kíl is'aawaa'ahlanggaa kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kíl is'aawaa'ahlanggang kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kíl is'waa'ahl kíl
     is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl is'waaäseehl kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kíl is'ang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'angga kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'anggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: kíl is'anggan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'aangaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: kíl is'aangaan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: kíl is'ans kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kíl is'aangaas kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'angang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'aangaa.ang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl is'anggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'anggiinii kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'anggaangaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'anggaangaan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl is'angäsaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl is'angäs kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl is'angäsaang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl is'angäsga kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'angäsaas kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'angäsaa.ang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'uuj kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'uujang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl is'angäsaa'uujang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'us kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'ang'ujaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ang'uujaangaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'angäsaa'us kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kíl is'aang'ahlanggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: kíl is'aang'ahlanggan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'aang'ahlanggiinii kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl is'angäsaa'ahlans kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kíl is'aang'ahlans kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: kíl is'aangaa'ahlang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kíl is'aangaa'ahlanggaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kíl is'aangaa'ahlanggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: kíl is'aang'ahl kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl is'angäseehl kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kíl is'ang'uu kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'waa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'waa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'waang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kíl is'ang'wägan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'ang'aawaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kíl is'ang'aawaan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kíl is'ang'waas kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kíl is'ang'aawaas kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'ang'waa.ang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'ang'aawaa.ang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ang'wägiinii kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ang'wägaangaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ang'wägaangaan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kíl is'ang'waaäsaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kíl is'ang'waaäs kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kíl is'ang'waaäsaang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kíl is'ang'waaäsga kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'ang'waaäsaas kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kíl is'ang'waaäsaa.ang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasaa'áng kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl is'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'waa'uuj kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'waa'uujang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kíl is'ang'waaäsaa'uujang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'waa'us kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl is'ang'waa'ujaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ang'waa'uujaangaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kíl is'ang'waaäsaa'us kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'waa'ahlanggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kíl is'ang'waa'ahlanggan kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl is'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kíl is'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kíl is'ang'waa'ahlans kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kíl is'ang'aawaa'ahlang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kíl is'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kíl is'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kíl is'ang'waa'ahl kíl
     is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kíl is'ang'waaäseehl kíl
